Vermont statutes. Title 25 Navigation and Waters
Subchapter 3. Lights on Vessels

§ 81.
Repealed.
1959, No. 263, § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 1960.

§ 82.
Lake Champlain.

Steamboats, sloops, schooners, rafts, vessels, and other watercraft, navigating in the nighttime on Lake Champlain, within this State, or on a bay, harbor, river, or creek, the waters of which are common to such Lake, and when lying at anchor or at rest in the said waters shall carry and show such lights as are required by the applicable provisions of 33 U.S.C. §§ 172-180 and

46 U.S.C. § 526(b)

, United States Code, as amended.
If found without such lights, the captain, owner, master, or other person having charge, shall be fined not more than $50.00 nor less than $10.00.

§ 83.
Repealed.
1959, No. 263, § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 1960.